District of Columbia statutes.
11-707

Assignment of judges to and from Superior Court.

(a)

The chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals may designate and assign temporarily one or more judges of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to serve on the District of Columbia Court of Appeals or a division thereof whenever the business of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals so requires. Such designations or assignments shall be in conformity with the rules or orders of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

(b)

Upon presentation of a certificate of necessity by the chief judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals may designate and assign temporarily one or more judges of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals to serve as a judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 479, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-908.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-707.
1973 Ed., § 11-707.